Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1301
Farm land, defined; nonfarm land; designation.

As used in sections 72-1301 to 72-1305, unless the context otherwise requires, farm land shall mean land suitable for cultivation or grazing and devoted primarily to such purposes for a profit. Land suitable for cultivation or grazing acquired or owned by any entity of the state and devoted primarily to other public uses may administratively be designated as nonfarm land.

Laws 1967, c. 461, § 1, p. 1431.